California statutes. Insurance Code
(A) Any obligations of the insolvent insurer arising out of any reinsurance contracts, as well as obligations incurred after the expiration date of the policy or after the insurance policy has been replaced by the insured or canceled at the insured’s request, or after the policy has been canceled by the California Insurance Guarantee Association, the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association, or another association or entity performing a similar function in another state.

(B) Any obligations to insurers, insurance pools, or underwriting associations, and their claims for contribution, indemnity, or subrogation, equitable or otherwise, except
 as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(C) Any amount awarded as punitive or exemplary damages, and any damages in excess of the liability limits of the policies or contracts that represent damages for contractual bad faith.

(D) Any amount that is a surplus deposit of a subscriber as defined in Section 1374.1.

(E) Any judgments against or obligations or liabilities of the insolvent insurer otherwise arising from alleged or proven torts, and any default, collusive, or stipulated judgment against either the insured or the person subject to proceedings under this article, as well as any judgment taken in violation of Section 1020. Nothing in this subparagraph shall prohibit the commissioner from considering the underlying claims as a claim entitled to priority under this section, provided that the claimant shall provide
 to the commissioner a written election that the judgment shall in all things be disregarded in determining the liability for and valuation of the underlying claim.

(F) Any loss adjustment expenses, including adjustment fees and expenses, attorneys’ fees and expenses, court costs, interest, bond premiums, expert witness fees, and other claims of a similar nature incurred prior to the appointment of a liquidator.

(G) Claims arising from any self-insured program of the insurer, including employee life, health and annuity plans, and self-funded employee benefit plans, however denominated, as well as claims arising from a multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in Section 514 of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, a minimum premium group insurance plan, a stop-loss group insurance plan, or an administrative services-only plan.

(H) Any portion of a policy or contract to the extent that it provides experience rating credits or refunds, dividends, or for the payment of fees or allowances to any person, including the policyholder or contractholder, in connection with the service to or administration of the policy or contract.

(I) Any annuity issued by a charitable organization for which the person subject to these proceedings did not have or utilize a certificate of authority to issue the policy or contract.

(3) Claims having preference by the laws of the United States.

(4) Unpaid charges due under the provisions of Section 736.

(5) Taxes due to the State of California.

(6) Claims having preference by the laws of this state.

(7) Claims of creditors not included in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive.

(8) Certificates of contribution, surplus notes, or similar obligations, and premium refunds on assessable policies.

(9) The interests of shareholders or other owners in any residual value in the estate.

(b) (1) Every claim allowed under a separate account policy, contract, or agreement providing, in effect, that the assets allocated to the separate account are not chargeable with liabilities arising out of any other business of the insurer, shall be satisfied out of the assets properly allocated to and maintained in the separate account,
 excluding amounts allocated or transferred to the separate account by the insurer pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10506, equal to the reserves maintained in the separate account for the policies, contracts, or agreements. No liabilities of the insurer arising out of any other business of the insurer shall be satisfied from assets properly allocated to and maintained in a separate account except (A) from amounts allocated or transferred to the separate account pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10506 and (B) from any assets allocated to the separate account that exceed the reserves under the separate account policies, contracts, or agreements. For the purposes of this subdivision, “separate account policies, contracts, or agreements” means any policies, contracts, or agreements that provide for separate accounts as contemplated by Section 10506, 10506.3, 10506.4, or 10541. Any valid and allowed claim for contractual benefits that cannot be satisfied out of the assets properly allocated to and
 maintained in a separate account for obligations authorized by subdivision (a) of Section 10506.3 shall be included as a claim against the general account within paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). Any valid and allowed claim against the general account for contractual benefits under an obligation authorized by Section 10506.4 shall be included as a claim within paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent that any assets of a life insurer, other than those assets properly allocated to, and maintained in, a separate account, have been used to fund or pay any expenses, taxes, or policyholder benefits that are attributable to a separate account policy, contract, or agreement that should have been paid by a separate account prior to the commencement of delinquency proceedings, then upon the commencement of delinquency proceedings, the separate accounts that benefited from this payment or funding
 shall first be used to repay or reimburse the company’s general assets or account for any unreimbursed net sums due at the commencement of delinquency proceedings prior to the application of the separate account assets to the satisfaction of liabilities of the corresponding separate account policies, contracts, and agreements.

(c) Upon the issuance of an order appointing a conservator or liquidator for any person under either Section 1011 or 1016 or both these sections, the lien of taxes due to the State of California imposed by Article 4 (commencing with Section 12491) of Chapter 4 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall become subordinate to the reasonable administrative expenses of the proceeding under the order.

(d) The following definitions are for purposes of this section only and shall not be used to determine coverage under the California Life and
 Health Insurance Guarantee Association Act (Article 14.7 (commencing with Section 1067)):

(1) “Funding agreements” means those agreements authorized to be delivered or issued pursuant to Section 10541.

(2) “Annuity” means only those annuity contracts, including period-certain annuities issued by a life insurer, that require for their lawful issuance a certificate of authority from the commissioner, and excludes without limitation all instruments for which the commissioner’s certificate of authority is not required, such as promissory notes, installment loans, negotiable instruments, mortgages, and debentures.

(3) Reinsurance contracts shall not be included as insurance or annuity policies or contracts, or funding agreements. However, any insurance or annuity policy or contract, including any funding agreement, that
 is assumed by an insurer under an assumption reinsurance agreement pursuant to a plan of liquidation, rehabilitation, or reorganization shall, unless the plan provided otherwise, be deemed to retain the issue date of the original insurance or annuity policy or contract, or funding agreement that is assumed.

(e) The provisions of this section are severable. If any portion of this section is held invalid or is preempted by federal law, the remainder of the section and its application shall not be affected. Specifically, should any of paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) be held to be invalid or preempted by federal law, the claims included within the invalid paragraph shall be included within paragraph (7) of subdivision (a), and the remaining paragraphs shall not be affected thereby.

(f) No payment shall be made to any creditor in paragraphs (8) or (9) of
 subdivision (a), unless all claims in paragraphs (3) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) have been paid in full, together with interest at the legal rate of the date of the order commencing the proceeding or the date on which the claim became liquidated, whichever date is later. In proceedings involving life insurance companies, no payment shall be made for any claim in paragraph (7), (8), or (9) of subdivision (a) unless and until all claims in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) have been paid in full, together with interest at the legal rate, all claims in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) have been paid the full value of the policy or contract upon which the claim is based, as of the time of distribution to claimants, and all claims in paragraphs (3) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) have been paid in full, together with interest at the legal rate from the date of the order commencing the proceeding. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision, no payment of interest shall be made to any
 insurance guaranty association that receives early access disbursements from the estate pursuant to Section 1035.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 868, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.5.

(a) The purpose of this section is to clarify the rights and obligations of policyholders, claimants, guaranty funds, including the California Insurance Guarantee Association, and the liquidator with respect to a deductible agreement entered into between a policyholder and an insurer subject to liquidation proceedings under this article. These arrangements are commonly referred to as “large deductible” policies or programs, even though the actual amount of the deductible can vary significantly and may not be in fact large in amount. Deductible
 amounts under these arrangements may vary from as little as five thousand dollars ($5,000) to as much as $1,000,000 or more. This section shall be construed such that the claim payment obligations of the guaranty associations, including the California Insurance Guarantee Association, in total arising from deductible agreements will be substantially equivalent to those of the insurer, except as provided otherwise in each guaranty association’s enabling statute, including that of the California Insurance Guarantee Association, had the insurer continued in business and not become subject to a liquidation proceeding.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or contract to the contrary, any collateral held by or for the benefit of, or assigned to, the insurer or the liquidator to secure the obligations of a policyholder under a deductible agreement and any reimbursement payments to the liquidator under a deductible agreement shall be
 considered property of the liquidated company, but shall not be general assets of the liquidated company. The liquidator shall maintain, administer, and distribute all such collateral and deductible reimbursement payments only as provided in this section.

(c) If a claim that is subject to a deductible agreement and secured by collateral is not covered by a guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association and the policyholder is unwilling or unable to take over the handling and payment of the noncovered claims, the liquidator shall adjust and pay the noncovered claims utilizing the collateral, but only to the extent the available collateral, after allocation under subdivision (d), is sufficient to pay all outstanding and anticipated claims. If the collateral is exhausted and the policyholder is not able to provide funds to pay the remaining claims within the deductible after all reasonable means of collection against the
 policyholder have been exhausted, the remaining claims shall be claims against the insurer’s estate, subject to the other provisions of this article regarding the filing and allowance of claims. When the liquidator determines that the collateral is insufficient to pay all additional and anticipated claims, the liquidator may file a plan for equitably allocating the collateral among claimants, subject to court approval.

(d) (1) To the extent that the liquidator holds collateral provided by a policyholder that was obtained to secure a deductible agreement and to secure other obligations of the policyholder to pay the insurer, directly or indirectly, amounts that become assets of the estate, such as reinsurance obligations under a captive reinsurance program or adjustable premium obligations under a retrospectively rated insurance policy or where the premium due is subject to adjustment based upon actual loss experience, the
 liquidator shall equitably allocate the collateral among those obligations and administer the collateral allocated to the deductible agreement pursuant to this section.

(2) With respect to the collateral allocated to obligations under the deductible agreement, if the collateral secured reimbursement obligations under more than one line of insurance, then the collateral shall be equitably allocated among the various lines based upon the estimated ultimate exposure within the deductible amount for each line.

(3) The liquidator shall inform the guaranty associations or the California Insurance Guarantee Association that is or may be obligated for claims against the insurer of the method and details of each allocation made pursuant to this subdivision.

(4) The liquidator shall be entitled to deduct from the collateral or
 from the deductible reimbursements reasonable and actual expenses incurred in connection with the collection of the collateral and deductible reimbursements under this section.

(e) (1) Regardless of whether there is collateral, if the insolvent insurer has contractually agreed to allow the policyholder to fund its own claims within the deductible amount pursuant to a deductible agreement, either through the policyholder’s own administration of its claims or through its provision of funds directly to a third-party administrator who administers the claims, the liquidator shall allow the funding arrangement to continue and, where applicable, shall enforce the arrangement to the fullest extent possible. The funding of any of these claims by the policyholder within the deductible amount, including, but not limited to, any of these claims by the policyholder or the third-party claimant, shall bar a claim for that amount in the
 liquidation proceeding.

(2) The funding of claims pursuant to paragraph (1) shall extinguish the obligation, if any, of a guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association to pay the claims within the deductible amount, as well as the obligation, if any, of the policyholder or third-party administrator to reimburse the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association. No charge of any kind shall be made by the liquidator against any guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association on the basis of the policyholder funding of claims payment made pursuant to the mechanism set forth in this subdivision. The funding of these claims by the policyholders shall not limit or prejudice any right the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association may have with respect to these claims under state law. Any policyholder that funds its own claims under the provisions of
 this subdivision shall provide to the guaranty association or to the California Insurance Guarantee Association all relevant information concerning the claim whenever the policyholder’s reserved liability for the claim equals or exceeds 50 percent of the deductible amount on the claim.

(f) (1) If the insurer has not contractually agreed to allow the policyholder to fund its own claims within the deductible amount, to the extent a guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association is required by applicable state law to pay any claims for which the insurer would be or would have been entitled to reimbursement from the policyholder under the terms of the deductible agreement, and to the extent the claims have not been paid by a policyholder or third party, the liquidator shall promptly bill the policyholder for the reimbursement. The policyholder shall pay that amount to the liquidator for the benefit of
 the California Insurance Guarantee Association or the guaranty association that paid the claims. Neither the insolvency of the insurer, nor its inability to perform any of its obligations under the deductible agreement, shall be a defense to the policyholder’s reimbursement obligation under the deductible agreement.

(2) When the policyholder reimbursements pursuant to paragraph (1) are collected, the liquidator shall promptly reimburse the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association for claims paid that were subject to the deductible. If the policyholder fails to pay the amounts due within 60 days after the bill for the reimbursements is due, the liquidator shall use the collateral to the extent necessary to reimburse the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association, and, at the same time, may pursue other collections efforts against the policyholder. If more than one guaranty association or
 the California Insurance Guarantee Association has a claim against the same collateral, and the available collateral, after allocation under subdivision (d), along with billing and collection efforts, are together insufficient to pay each guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association in full, then the liquidator shall prorate payments to each guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association based upon the relationship the amount of claims each guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association has paid bears to the total of all claims paid by the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association.

(g) (1) With respect to claim payments made by any guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association, the liquidator shall promptly provide the court, with a copy to the guaranty association or the California Insurance
 Guarantee Association, with a complete report of the liquidator’s deductible billing and collection activities, including copies of the policyholder billings when rendered, the reimbursements collected, the available amounts and use of collateral for each policyholder, and any proration of payments when it occurs. If the liquidator fails to make a good faith effort, within 120 days of receiving a claims payment report, to collect reimbursements due from a policyholder under a deductible agreement based on claim payments made by one or more guaranty associations or the California Insurance Guarantee Association, then the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association may pursue collection from the policyholders directly on the same basis as the liquidator, and with the same rights and remedies, and shall report any amounts so collected from each policyholder to the liquidator. To the extent that the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association pays claims
 within the deductible amount, but is not reimbursed by the liquidator under this section or by policyholder payments from the collection efforts of the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association, the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association shall have a claim against the insolvent insurer’s estate for the unreimbursed claims payments.

(2) The liquidator shall periodically adjust the collateral being held as the claims subject to the deductible agreement are satisfied, provided that adequate collateral is maintained to secure the entire estimated ultimate obligation of the policyholder plus a reasonable safety factor, and provided further that the liquidator shall not be required to adjust the collateral more than once a year. The guaranty associations or the California Insurance Guarantee Association shall be informed of any collateral adjustment, including but not limited to, the basis
 for the adjustment. Once all claims covered by the collateral have been paid and the liquidator is satisfied that no new claims can be presented, the liquidator shall release any remaining collateral to the policyholder.

(h) The court having jurisdiction over the liquidation proceedings shall have jurisdiction to resolve disputes arising under this provision.

(i) Nothing in this section is intended to limit or adversely affect any right a guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association may have under applicable state law to obtain reimbursement from certain classes of policyholders for claims payments made by the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association under policies of the insolvent insurer, or for related expenses the guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association incur.

(j) This section shall apply only with respect to insolvencies occurring on or after January 1, 2006.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Collateral” means any form of security held to secure the obligations of a policyholder under a deductible agreement with an insurer subject to an order of liquidation under this article.

(2) “Deductible agreement” means any policy, endorsement, contract, or security agreement, or a combination of any of those items, that provides for the policyholder to bear the risk of loss within a specified amount per claim or occurrence covered under a policy of insurance, and may be subject to the aggregate limit of policyholder reimbursement obligations.

(3) “Noncovered claim” means a claim that is subject to a deductible agreement and is not covered by a guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association.

(l) This section shall apply to claims funded by a guaranty association or the California Insurance Guarantee Association in excess of the deductible only if subdivision (e) is applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 95, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1034.

(a) A preference is a transfer of any of the property of the person proceeded against to or for the benefit of a creditor, for or on account of an antecedent debt, made or suffered by the person proceeded against within one year before the filing of a petition for liquidation pursuant to Section 1016, the effect of which transfer may be to enable the creditor to obtain a greater percentage of this debt than another creditor of the same class would receive. The following transactions shall be among those that may be considered a preference:

(1) A transfer of property of the person proceeded against.

(2) The creation of a lien on the property of the person proceeded against.

(3) The entry of a judgment against the person proceeded against.

(4) The transfers or other payments by the person proceeded against pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 10506 in support of guarantees contemplated by Section 10506.4.

(b) If a liquidation order is entered pursuant to Section 1016 while the person proceeded against is already subject to a conservation order, then the transfers described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed preferences if made or suffered within one year before the filing of the successful petition for conservation, or within
 two years before the filing of the successful petition for liquidation, whichever time is shorter.

(c) Any preference may be avoided by the liquidator if any of the following is applicable:

(1) The transfer was made within four months before the filing of the petition.

(2) The creditor receiving the transfer or to be benefited thereby or his or her agent acting with reference thereto had, at the time when the transfer was made, reasonable cause to believe that the person proceeded against was insolvent or was about to become insolvent.

(3) The creditor receiving the transfer was an officer, or any employee or attorney or other person who was in fact in a position of comparable influence in the person proceeded against to an officer, whether or not the
 person held that position, or any shareholder holding directly or indirectly more than 5 percent of any class of any equity security issued by the person proceeded against, or any other person, firm, corporation, association, or aggregation of persons with whom the person proceeded against did not deal at arm’s length.

(d) Where the preference is voidable, the liquidator may recover the property or, if it has been converted, its value from any person who has received or converted the property; except where a bona fide purchaser or lienor has given less than fair equivalent value, the purchaser or lienor shall have a lien upon the property to the extent of the consideration actually given. Where a preference by way of lien or security title is voidable, the court may on due notice order the lien or title to be preserved for the benefit of the estate, in which event the lien or title shall pass to the liquidator.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 580, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1034.1.

(a) Every transfer made or suffered and every obligation incurred by a person proceeded against within one year prior to the filing of a successful petition for conservation or liquidation under this article is fraudulent as to then existing and future creditors if made or incurred without fair consideration, or with actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud either existing or future creditors.

(b) A transfer made or an obligation incurred by a person proceeded against under this
 article, which is fraudulent under this section, may be avoided by the commissioner, except as to a person who in good faith is a purchaser, lienor, or obligee for a present fair equivalent value, and except that any purchaser, lienor, or obligee, who in good faith has given a consideration less than fair for that transfer, lien, or obligation, may retain the property, lien, or obligation as security for repayment. The court may, on due notice, order any such transfer or obligation to be preserved for the benefit of the estate, and in that event, the commissioner shall succeed to and may enforce the rights of the purchaser, lienor, or obligee.

(1) A transfer of property other than real property shall be deemed to be made or suffered when it becomes so far perfected that no subsequent lien obtainable by legal or equitable proceedings on a simple contract could become superior to the rights of the transferee.

(2) A transfer of real property shall be deemed to be made or suffered when it becomes so far perfected that no subsequent bona fide purchaser from the person proceeded against could obtain rights superior to the rights of the transferee.

(3) A transfer that creates an equitable lien shall not be deemed to be perfected if there are available means by which a legal lien could be created.

(4) Any transfer not perfected prior to the filing of a petition for liquidation shall be deemed to be made immediately before the filing of the successful petition.

(5) The provisions of this subdivision apply whether or not there are or were creditors who might have obtained any liens or persons who might have become bona fide purchasers.

(c) Every person receiving any property from the person proceeded against or any benefit thereof that is a fraudulent transfer under subdivision (a) shall be personally liable therefor and shall be bound to account to the commissioner.

(d) Any transaction of the person proceeded against with a reinsurer shall be subject to avoidance by the commissioner under subdivision (b) if both of the following are applicable:

(1) The transaction consists of the termination, adjustment, or settlement of a reinsurance contract in which the reinsurer is released from any part of its duty to pay the originally specified share of losses that had occurred prior to the time of the transaction, unless the reinsurer gives a present fair equivalent value for the release.

(2) Any part of the transaction took place within one year prior to the date of filing of the petition through which the conservation or liquidation was commenced.

The commissioner may avoid the transaction at any time within two years after the effective date of the transaction. If the transaction is so avoided, the parties shall be returned to their respective position as if the transaction had not occurred, and the commissioner may enforce the reinsurance contract as it existed prior to the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 580, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.

(a) In any proceeding under this article, the commissioner may appoint and employ under his or her hand and official seal, special deputy commissioners, as his or her agents, and to employ clerks and assistants and to give to each of them those powers that he or she deems necessary. Upon appointing or employing special deputy commissioners or executive officers, the commissioner shall notify the Chair of the
 Joint Legislative Budget Committee, by letter, of the action. The costs of employing special deputy commissioners, clerks, and assistants appointed to carry out this article, and all expenses of taking possession of, conserving, conducting, liquidating, disposing of, or otherwise dealing with the business and property of that person under this article, shall be fixed by the commissioner, subject to the approval of the court, and shall be paid out of the assets of that person to the department. In the event the property of that person does not contain cash or liquid assets sufficient to defray the cost of the services required to be performed under the terms of this article, the commissioner may at any time or from time to time pay the cost of those services out of the appropriation for the maintenance of the department, but not out of the assets of other estates. Any amounts so paid shall be deemed expenses of administration and shall be repaid to the fund out of the first available moneys in the estate.

(b) Any person appointed by the commissioner to serve in the capacity of chief executive officer of the department’s Conservation and Liquidation Office shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 14.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.2.

(a) The officers and employees of the Conservation and Liquidation Office are subject to all conflict-of-interest provisions and financial disclosure requirements that would apply if they were employees of the department.

(b) (1) Prior to February 1, 2002, the department shall determine, pursuant to the provisions of Section 19990 of the Government Code, those activities of the officers and employees of the Conservation and Liquidation Office that are
 inconsistent, incompatible, or in conflict with their duties as officers or employees of that office.

(2) Prior to February 1, 2002, the department shall adopt and promulgate a Conflict of Interest Code pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 87300) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code, pertaining to the officers and employees of the Conservation and Liquidation Office. The Conflict of Interest Code and any other regulations necessary to implement this section shall be promulgated by the department as emergency regulations.

(c) The provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 87100) of Title 9 of the Government Code shall apply to a person who contracts with the Conservation and Liquidation Office to the same extent as would apply if that person were entering into the same or similar contractual relationship with the department.

(d) The department shall ensure that the officers and employees of the Conservation and Liquidation Office and persons who contract with that office comply with all provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 630, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010), with regard only to those insurers subject to this article:

(a) Within 120 days of the issuance of an order directing the winding up and liquidation of the business of an insolvent insurer under Section 1016, the commissioner shall make application to the court for approval of a proposal to disburse the insurer’s assets, from time to time as such assets become available, to the California Insurance Guarantee Association,
 or the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association, and to any entity or person performing a similar function in another state.

(b) The proposal shall at least include the following provisions for:

(1) Reserving amounts for the payment of expenses of administration and the payment of claims of secured creditors (to the extent of the value of the security held) and claims falling within the priorities established in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1033.

(2) Disbursement of the assets marshaled to date and subsequent disbursements of assets as they become available.

(3) Equitable allocation of disbursements to each of the associations entitled thereto.

(4) The securing by the commissioner from each of the associations entitled to disbursements pursuant to this section of an agreement to return to the commissioner such assets previously disbursed as may be required to pay claims of secured creditors and claims falling within the priorities established in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1033 in accordance with the priorities. No bond shall be required of any association.

(5) A full report to be made by the association to the commissioner accounting for all assets so disbursed to the association, all disbursements made therefrom, any interest earned by the association on the assets, and any other matter as the court may direct.

(c) The commissioner’s proposal shall provide for disbursements to the associations in amounts estimated at least
 equal to the claim payments made or to be made by the associations for which such associations could assert a claim against the commissioner, and shall further provide that if the assets available for disbursement from time to time do not equal or exceed the amount of the claim payments made or to be made by the associations, then disbursements shall be in the amount of available assets. The reserves of the insolvent insurer on the date of the order of liquidation shall be used for purposes of determining the pro rata allocation of funds among eligible associations.

(d) The commissioner shall offset the amount disbursed to any entity or person performing a function in any other state similar to that function performed by the California Insurance Guarantee Association, or the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association, by the amount of any statutory deposit, premiums, or any other asset of the insolvent insurer held in that
 state.

(e) Notice of such application shall be given to the associations in and to the commissioners of insurance of each of the states. Any such notice shall be deemed to have been given when deposited in the United States certified mails, first-class postage prepaid, at least 30 days prior to submission of such application to the court. Action on the application may be taken by the court provided the above required notice has been given and provided further that the commissioner’s proposal complies with paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 974, Sec. 1.4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1036.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 11040) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, pertaining to legal services, shall apply in the institution and prosecution of all insurance delinquency proceedings under this code. The compensation of any counsel outside of California state service who is employed pursuant to these provisions to represent the commissioner as receiver shall be fixed by the commissioner, subject to the approval of the court. Compensation of counsel
 representing the commissioner as receiver shall be paid from the assets of the person against whom the commissioner has proceeded under this article. It is the intent of the Legislature and the Legislature finds it is in the best interest of the people of the State of California that the Attorney General and the Insurance Commissioner consult and cooperate in regard to utilizing agency counsel of the Department of Insurance as the commissioner’s legal counsel in delinquency proceedings, judicial and otherwise, to the extent appropriate and consistent with the interests of the parties beneficially interested in those proceedings and if that use would result in the savings of costs to the parties beneficially interested in those proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1037.

Upon taking possession of the property and business of any person in any proceeding under this article, the commissioner, exclusively and except as otherwise expressly provided by this article, either as conservator or liquidator:

(a) Shall have authority to collect all moneys due that person, and to do such other acts as are necessary or expedient to collect, conserve, or protect its assets, property, and business, and to carry on and conduct the business and affairs of that person or so much thereof as to him or her may seem appropriate.

(b) Shall collect all debts due and claims belonging to that person, and shall have the authority to sell, compound, compromise, or assign, for the purpose of collection upon such terms and conditions as the commissioner deems best, any bad or doubtful debts.

(c) Shall have authority to compound, compromise or in any other manner negotiate settlements of claims against that person upon such terms and conditions as the commissioner shall deem to be most advantageous to the estate of the person being administered or liquidated or otherwise dealt with under this article.

(d) Shall have authority without notice, to acquire, hypothecate, encumber, lease, improve, sell, transfer, abandon, or otherwise dispose of or deal with, any real or personal property of that person at its reasonable market value, or, in cases other than acquisition, sale, or transfer on the basis of
 reasonable market value, upon such terms and conditions as the commissioner may deem proper. However, no transaction involving real or personal property shall be made where the market value of the property involved exceeds the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) without first obtaining permission of the court, and then only in accordance with any terms that court may prescribe.
